Massachusetts, session 194th, S165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 15 of Chapter 19C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking the definition for “employer” and inserting in place 
thereof the following definition:-  
“Employer”, an entity that provides services or treatment to persons with intellectual or 
developmental disabilities pursuant to (i) a contract or agreement with the department; (ii) 
funding administered by the department; (iii) a license issued pursuant to section 15 or 15A of 
chapter 19B; or (iv) a contract with MassHealth to provide day habilitation services subject to 
130 CMR 419.000.